District of Columbia statutes.
19-1307.09

Reimbursement of expenses.

(a)

A trustee is entitled to be reimbursed out of the trust property, with interest as appropriate, for:

(1)

Expenses that were properly incurred in the administration of the trust; and

(2)

To the extent necessary to prevent unjust enrichment of the trust, expenses that were not properly incurred in the administration of the trust.

(b)

An advance by the trustee of money for the protection of the trust gives rise to a lien against trust property to secure reimbursement with reasonable interest.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 709 of the Uniform Trust Code.